Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.515 to
456.725.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall establish  and
maintain a senior housing development initiative to incentivize housing targeted to older
adults and persons with disabilities, including  housing that prioritizes visitability and acces-
sibility, but not including  housing for the purpose of providing care. Under the initiative, the
department shall:
(a) Make available state and  federal resources to support the development, rehabilitation
and preservation of housing for older adults and persons with disabilities, and leverage ex-
isting moneys to increase development, redevelopment and preservation opportunities.
(b) Provide technical assistance to developers, affordable housing  and service providers,
planners, stakeholders and local governments to:
(A) Support housing location, design, development and  the delivery of home and
community-based services for older adults; and
(B) Help ensure housing developments  meet the needs of older adults to age well in their
homes and communities through housing that enables choice,  safety and physical accessi-
bility.
(c) Provide regular  public updates and track goals and progress relating to affordable
rental housing targeted toward populations of older adults and persons with  disabilities. Up-
dates that must be given  under this paragraph may be provided through or in coordination
with the department’s housing equity indicators under ORS 456.602.
(2) The department may contract with a public or private provider  for the administration
of the initiative.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding ORS 311.701, the  amount of $24,000,000 is transferred from
the Senior Property Tax Deferral Revolving Account  to the General Fund for general gov-
ernmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund:
Enrolled House Bill 3589 (HB 3589-A) Page 1
(1) $23,500,000 for deposit into the General Housing Account under  ORS 458.620, to fund
the development, rehabilitation or preservation of housing for older adults and persons with
disabilities under the  senior housing development initiative in section 2 (1)(a) of this 2025
Act.
(2) $500,000 to provide technical assistance under  the senior housing development initi-
ative in section 2 (1)(b) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Revenue shall, before December 31 of each year, es-
timate the amount required to be maintained in the Senior Property Tax Deferral  Revolving
Account under ORS 311.701 to fund  the obligations for the following year. The department
shall assume that the obligations will equal the payments and administrative costs  that were
made in the highest year over a 10-year look-back period, as adjusted  for the current com-
position of payments and population.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 305.100 (1), any estimate or rule of  the department under this
section must be based on certain reasonable  conditions with respect to the solvency of the
account.
(3) On or before January 31 of  the year for which an estimate is made and at least 14
days after providing notice to the Legislative Revenue Officer of the  proposed transfer, the
department shall transfer the positive  difference between the amount in the account on the
date of estimation made in  subsection (1) of this section and the estimated obligations under
subsection (1) of this  section, if any, to the Housing and Community Services Department
for deposit into the General Housing Account under ORS 458.620 for use by  the department
to implement the senior housing development initiative under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2031.
SECTION 8.  ORS 317.097, as amended by section 25, chapter 75, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
317.097. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Annual rate” means the yearly interest rate specified on the note, and  not the annual per-
centage rate, if any, disclosed to the applicant to comply with the federal Truth in Lending Act.
(b) “Bonds”  means a bond, as defined in ORS 286A.001, if issued on behalf of the Housing and
Community Services  Department, or bonds, as defined in ORS 456.055, if issued by a housing au-
thority.
(c) “Finance charge” means the total of all interest, loan  fees, interest on any loan fees financed
by the lending institution, and other charges related to the cost of obtaining credit.
(d) “Lending institution” means  any insured institution, as that term is defined in ORS 706.008,
any mortgage banking company that maintains an office  in this state or any community development
corporation that is organized under the Oregon Nonprofit Corporation Law.
(e) “Limited equity cooperative” means  a cooperative corporation formed under ORS chapter 62
whose articles of incorporation, in addition  to the other requirements of ORS chapter 62, prohibit
members from selling their ownership interests:
(A) To any person other than a low income person; or
(B) For a sales price that exceeds the sum of:
(i) The price the member paid for the ownership interest;
(ii) The cost of  any permanent improvements the member made to the housing unit during the
member’s ownership;
(iii) Any special assessments the member  paid to the limited equity cooperative during the
member’s ownership that were expended to make permanent improvements to the building in  which
the member’s housing unit is located; and
(iv) A return  on the amounts described in sub-subparagraphs (i) to (iii) of this subparagraph,
computed from the year in which the  respective amount was paid, that equals the greater of the
result of adjusting each amount by the  percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers,  West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of
Enrolled House Bill 3589 (HB 3589-A) Page 2
the United States Department of Labor, or of  increasing each amount by three percent compounded
annually.
(f) “Manufactured dwelling park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(g) “Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that  is exempt from income taxes under section
501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2023.
(h) “Preservation project” means housing that was previously developed as affordable housing
with a contract for rent assistance  from the United States Department of Housing and Urban De-
velopment or the United States Department of Agriculture and that is being acquired  by a spon-
soring entity.
(i) “Qualified assignee” means any investor participating  in the secondary market for real estate
loans.
(j) “Qualified borrower” means any  borrower that is a sponsoring entity that has a controlling
interest in the real property that is  financed by a qualified loan. A controlling interest includes a
controlling interest in the general partner of a limited partnership that owns the real property.
(k) “Qualified loan” means:
(A) A loan that meets the criteria stated in subsection (5) of this section or that is made to  re-
finance a loan that meets the criteria described in subsection (5) of this section; or
(B) The purchase by a lending institution of bonds, the proceeds  of which are used to finance
or refinance a loan that meets the criteria described in subsection (5) of this section.
(L) “Sponsoring entity” means a  nonprofit corporation, nonprofit cooperative, state govern-
mental entity, local unit of government as defined  in ORS 466.706, housing authority or any other
person, provided that the person has agreed to  restrictive covenants imposed by a nonprofit corpo-
ration, nonprofit cooperative, state governmental entity, local unit of government  or housing au-
thority.
(2) The Department of Revenue  shall allow a credit against taxes otherwise due under this
chapter for the tax year to a lending institution that  makes a qualified loan certified by the Housing
and Community Services Department as provided in subsection  (7) of this section. The amount of the
credit is equal to the difference between:
(a) The amount of finance charge charged by the lending institution during the tax year at an
annual rate less than the market rate for a qualified loan that is made before  January 1, 2026, that
complies with the requirements of this section; and
(b) The amount of finance charge that would  have been charged during the tax year by the
lending institution for the qualified loan for housing construction,  development, acquisition or re-
habilitation measured at the annual rate charged by the lending  institution for nonsubsidized loans
made under like terms and conditions  at the time the qualified loan for housing construction, de-
velopment, acquisition or rehabilitation is made.
(3) The maximum amount of  credit for the difference between the amounts described in sub-
section (2)(a) and (b) of this section may not exceed four percent of the average unpaid  balance of
the qualified loan during the tax year for which the credit is claimed.
(4) Any tax credit allowed under  this section that is not used by the taxpayer in a particular
year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the  next succeeding
tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and
used in the second succeeding  tax year, and likewise, any credit not used in that second succeeding
tax year may be carried forward  and used in the third succeeding tax year, and any credit not used
in that  third succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the fourth succeeding tax year,
and any credit not used in that fourth succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the
fifth succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(5) To be eligible for the tax credit  allowable under this section, a lending institution must make
a qualified loan by either purchasing bonds, the proceeds of which are used to finance or  refinance
a loan that meets the criteria stated in this subsection, or making a loan directly to:
Enrolled House Bill 3589 (HB 3589-A) Page 3
(a) An individual or individuals who own a  dwelling, participate in an owner-occupied commu-
nity rehabilitation program and are certified by the  local government or its designated agent as
having an income level when the loan is made of 80 percent of the area median income or less;
(b) A qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to  finance construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation
of housing, including housing in the form of a limited equity cooperative; and
(B) Provides  a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment that the:
(i) Housing created by the loan is or will be occupied by households earning  80 percent of the
area median income or less; and
(ii) Full amount of savings from the reduced interest rate provided by the lending  institution is
or will be passed on, in the form of reduced housing payments, to the tenants or to the holders  of
proprietary leases in a limited equity cooperative;
(c) Subject to subsection (14) of this section, a qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to finance  construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation
of housing consisting of a manufactured dwelling park; and
(B) Provides a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services  Depart-
ment that the housing will continue to be operated as a manufactured dwelling park during the  pe-
riod for which the tax credit is allowed;
(d) A qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to finance acquisition or rehabilitation of  housing consisting of a
preservation project; and
(B) Provides  a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment that the housing preserved by the loan:
(i) Is  or will be occupied by households earning 80 percent of the area median income or less;
and
(ii) Is the subject of a rent assistance contract with  the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development or the United States Department of Agriculture  that will be maintained by
the qualified borrower; or
(e) A qualified borrower who:
(A) Uses the loan proceeds to  finance construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation
of housing; and
(B) Provides  a written certification executed by the Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment or the governmental party  to the rent assistance contract that the housing preserved by the
loan:
(i) Is or will be occupied by households earning 80 percent of the area median income or  less;
and
(ii) Is the subject of a rent assistance contract with the federal government or with a  state or
local government that will be maintained by the qualified borrower and that limits a tenant’s  rent
to no more than 30 percent of their income.
(6) A loan made to refinance a loan that meets  the criteria stated in subsection (5) of this sec-
tion must be treated the same as a loan that meets the criteria stated in  subsection (5) of this sec-
tion.
(7) For a qualified loan  to be eligible for the tax credit allowable under this section, the Housing
and Community Services Department must execute a  written certification for the qualified loan that:
(a) States  that the qualified loan is within the limitation imposed by subsection (8) of this sec-
tion; and
(b) Specifies  the period, as determined by the Housing and Community Services Department,
during which the tax credit is allowed for the qualified loan, not to exceed:
(A) 30 years, for a qualified loan with a contract for rent assistance or financing  resources from
the United States Department of  Agriculture, for new housing construction, acquisition of housing
or a preservation project; or
Enrolled House Bill 3589 (HB 3589-A) Page 4
(B) 20 years, for any other type of qualified loan.
(8) The Housing and Community Services Department may certify qualified loans that are eligi-
ble under subsection (5) of this section if the total credits attributable  to all qualified loans eligible
for credits under this section and then outstanding do not exceed  $35 million for any fiscal year. In
making loan certifications under subsection (7) of this section, the Housing and Community  Services
Department shall attempt to distribute the tax credits statewide,  but shall concentrate the tax
credits in those areas of the state  that are determined by the Oregon Housing Stability Council to
have the greatest need for affordable housing.
(9) The tax credit provided for in this section may be taken whether or not:
(a) The financial institution is eligible to take a federal  income tax credit under section 42 of
the Internal Revenue Code with respect to the project financed by the qualified loan; [ or]
(b) The project receives financing from bonds, the interest on  which is exempt from federal
taxation under section 103 of the Internal Revenue Code[ .]; or
(c) The project receives moneys from the Elderly and Disabled Housing Fund  under ORS
456.535.
(10) For a qualified loan defined in subsection (1)(k)(B)  of this section financed through the
purchase of bonds, the interest of which is exempt from federal taxation under section 103 of the
Internal Revenue Code, the  amount of finance charge that would have been charged under sub-
section (2)(b) of this section is determined by reference to the finance charge that would  have been
charged if the federally tax exempt bonds had been issued and the tax credit under  this section did
not apply.
(11) A lending institution  may sell a qualified loan for which a certification has been executed
to a qualified assignee whether or not the lending institution retains servicing of the qualified  loan
so long  as a designated lending institution maintains records, annually verified by a loan servicer,
that establish the amount of tax credit earned by the taxpayer throughout each year of eligibility.
(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  a lending institution that is a community de-
velopment corporation organized under the Oregon Nonprofit Corporation Law may transfer all or
part of a tax credit allowed under this section to one or more other lending institutions that  are
stockholders or members of  the community development corporation or that otherwise participate
through the  community development corporation in the making of one or more qualified loans for
which the tax credit under this section is allowed.
(13) The lending institution shall file an annual statement with the Housing and  Community
Services  Department,  specifying that it has conformed with all requirements imposed by law to
qualify for a tax credit under this section.
(14) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(j) and (L) of this section, a qualified  borrower on a loan to
finance the construction, development, acquisition or rehabilitation of a manufactured dwelling  park
under subsection (5)(c) of this section must be:
(a) A nonprofit corporation, manufactured dwelling park  nonprofit cooperative, state govern-
mental entity, local unit of government as defined in ORS 466.706 or housing authority; or
(b) A nonprofit corporation or housing authority that has a controlling interest in the  real
property that is financed by a qualified loan. A  controlling interest includes a controlling interest
in the general partner of a limited partnership that owns the real property.
(15) The Department of Revenue  may require that a lending institution that has earned the
credit and a lending institution that intends to claim the credit  jointly file a notice, as prescribed
by the Department of Revenue. The notice must comply with ORS 315.056 (2) or 315.058 (2).
(16) The  Housing and Community Services Department shall provide information to the Depart-
ment of Revenue about all certifications executed under this section, if required by ORS 315.058.
(17) The Housing and Community Services Department and the Department  of Revenue may
adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3589 (HB 3589-A) Page 5
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3589 (HB 3589-A) Page 6